Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 8.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-508
Attorney General; enforcement powers.

To enforce the provisions of the Reduced Cigarette Ignition Propensity Act, the Attorney General may examine the books, papers, invoices, and other records of any person in possession, control, or occupancy of any premises where cigarettes are placed, stored, sold, or offered for sale, as well as the stock of cigarettes on the premises. Every person in the possession, control, or occupancy of any premises where cigarettes are placed, sold, or offered for sale shall give the Attorney General the means, facilities, and opportunity for the examinations authorized by the act.

Laws 2009, LB198, § 8.